Washington statutes.
RCW 40.16.020

Injury to and misappropriation of record.

Every officer who shall mutilate, destroy, conceal, erase, obliterate, or falsify any record or paper appertaining to the officer's office, or who shall fraudulently appropriate to the officer's own use or to the use of another person, or secrete with intent to appropriate to such use, any money, evidence of debt or other property intrusted to the officer by virtue of the officer's office, is guilty of a class B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ten years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or by both.

[ 2003 c 53 s 215; 1992 c 7 s 35; 1909 c 249 s 96; RRS s 2348.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.